Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 9. Operation of Vending Facilities by Blind and Visually Impaired

§ 501.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Person who is blind or visually impaired” means a person whose visual acuity with correction is no better than 20/60, or whose field of vision subtends an angle of no greater than 20 degrees.

“Division” means the Division for the Blind and Visually Impaired.

“State property” means any building or land owned, leased, or controlled by the Department of Buildings and General Services.

“Vending facility” means a cafeteria, snack bar, cart service, concession stand, or other facility for the sale of newspapers, periodicals, confection, tobacco products, foods, beverages, and other articles or services which is operated by a person licensed under this subchapter.

“Vending machine” means any coin or currency operated machine that sells food, tobacco, beverages, sundries, or other retail merchandise or service, but shall not include vending machines used in connection with the operation of rest room facilities.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(1);

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 132.

§ 502.
Duties.

The Division shall have the authority to:

establish vending facilities on State property;

coordinate with the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services or the designee of the Commissioner, for the establishment of vending facilities;

issue licenses to persons who are blind or visually impaired for the operation of vending facilities on State property;

provide vending facility equipment and an adequate initial stock of suitable articles to licensed persons who are blind or visually impaired;

provide the necessary training and supervision to licensed persons who are blind or visually impaired;

adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter including criteria for the selection and operation of vending facilities and machines, distribution of income to vendors, and grievance procedures.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(1), eff. May 6, 1996;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 133.

§ 503.
Vending machines.

If it is determined by the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living and the Department of Buildings and General Services that a vending facility is not economically feasible in a particular location, vending machines may be placed in that location. Contracts shall be awarded by the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living in accordance with the procedures set forth in

29 V.S.A. § 161

, notwithstanding the $50,000.00 limitation therein.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1995, No. 62

, § 56, eff. April 26, 1995;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(1);

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 52.

§ 504.
Income from vending facilities and machines.

All net income from a vending facility on State property shall accrue to the person who is blind or visually impaired and licensed to operate that facility.

All net income from vending machines not placed within vending facilities on State property shall accrue to the Division.

Income which accrues to the Division under this subchapter shall be used to:

maintain or enhance the vending facilities program;

provide benefit programs, including health insurance or pension plans for licensed persons who are blind or visually impaired who operate vending facilities;

provide vocational rehabilitation services for persons who are blind or visually impaired.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2005, No. 71

, § 135;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 134.

§ 505.
Vending facilities; operation by other than a person who is blind or visually impaired.

Where vending facilities on State property are operated by those other than persons who are blind or visually impaired on July 1, 1984, the contracts of these vending facilities may be renewed or extended. A person who does not intend to renew or extend such a contract shall so notify the Director of the Division in a timely manner. Within 30 days of such notice, the Director shall determine whether the vending facility is suited for operation by a person who is blind or visually impaired. If the Director determines that the facility is suited for operation by such person, preference in operation of the facility shall be given to a person who is blind or visually impaired.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 135.

§ 506.
Exemptions.

The following are exempt from the provisions of this subchapter:

food services or vending machines provided by hospitals or residential institutions as a direct service to patients, inmates, students or otherwise institutionalized persons; and

State property not under the control of the Department of Buildings and General Services.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(1).